bg-BG: Препоръчителен случай на употреба: Спешен/временен ремонт; Дългосрочен ремонт; Превантивно (лек теч); Състезания/използване на писта; Краткосрочен ремонт; Други
zh-TW: 建議用例: 緊急/暫時修復; 長期修復; 預防性 (輕微滲漏); 賽車/賽道使用; 短期修復; 其他
es: Caso de uso recomendado: Reparación de emergencia/temporal; Reparación a largo plazo; Preventivo (filtración menor); Uso en carreras/pistas; Reparación a corto plazo; Otro
en: Recommended use case: Emergency/temporary repair; Long-term repair; Preventative (minor seepage); Racing/track use; Short-term repair; Other
nb: Anbefalt brukstilfelle: Nød-/midlertidig reparasjon; Langsiktig reparasjon; Forebyggende (mindre lekkasjer); Bruk på bane/racing; Kortsiktig reparasjon; Annet
cs: Doporučený případ použití: Nouzová/dočasná oprava; Dlouhodobá oprava; Preventivní (drobné průsaky); Závodní/okruhové použití; Krátkodobá oprava; Ostatní
de: Empfohlene Anwendung: Notfall/provisorische Reparatur; Langfristige Reparatur; Vorbeugend (geringes Durchsickern); Rennsport/Rennstrecke; Kurzfristige Reparatur; Sonstige
sv: Rekommenderat användningsområde: Nödlösning/tillfällig reparation; Långsiktig reparation; Förebyggande (mindre läckage); Racing/bana; Kortsiktig reparation; Övrigt
tr: Önerilen kullanım alanı: Acil durum/geçici onarım; Uzun süreli onarım; Önleyici (küçük sızıntılar); Yarış/pist kullanımı; Kısa süreli onarım; Diğer
ja: 推奨使用ケース: 緊急/一時的な修理; 長期的な修理; 予防 (軽度の浸出); レース/トラックでの使用; 短期的な修理; その他
pt-PT: Utilização recomendada: Reparação de emergência/temporária; Reparação a longo prazo; Preventivo (pequenas infiltrações); Uso em corrida/pista; Reparação a curto prazo; Outro
sl-SI: Priporočeni primer uporabe: Nujno/začasno popravilo; Dolgoročno popravilo; Preventivno (manjše pronicanje); Dirkalna/stezna uporaba; Kratkoročno popravilo; Drugo
hu: Ajánlott használati eset: Sürgősségi/ideiglenes javítás; Hosszú távú javítás; Megelőző (kisebb szivárgás); Verseny/pálya használat; Rövid távú javítás; Egyéb
it: Caso d'uso consigliato: Riparazione di emergenza/temporanea; Riparazione a lungo termine; Preventiva (infiltrazioni minori); Uso in gara/pista; Riparazione a breve termine; Altro
pt-BR: Aplicação recomendada: Reparo de emergência/temporário; Reparo a longo prazo; Preventivo (pequena infiltração); Uso em corrida/pista; Reparo a curto prazo; Outro
lt-LT: Rekomenduojama naudojimo atvejis: Avarinis / laikinas taisymas; Ilgalaikis taisymas; Profilaktinis (nedidelis prasisunkimas); Lenktynės / naudojimas trasoje; Trumpalaikis taisymas; Kita
el: Περίπτωση προτεινόμενης χρήσης: Έκτακτη/προσωρινή επισκευή; Μακροπρόθεσμη επισκευή; Προληπτική (μικρή διαρροή); Χρήση σε αγώνες/πίστα; Βραχυπρόθεσμη επισκευή; Άλλο
pl: Zalecane zastosowanie: Naprawa awaryjna/tymczasowa; Naprawa długoterminowa; Zapobiegawcze (drobne wycieki); Użytek wyścigowy/torowy; Naprawa krótkoterminowa; Inne
fi: Suositeltu käyttötarkoitus: Hätä-/tilapäiskorjaus; Pitkäaikainen korjaus; Ennaltaehkäisevä (pieni vuoto); Kilpa-/ratakäyttö; Lyhytaikainen korjaus; Muu
th: กรณีการใช้งานที่แนะนำ: การซ่อมแซมฉุกเฉิน/ชั่วคราว; การซ่อมแซมระยะยาว; การป้องกัน (การซึมเล็กน้อย); สำหรับการแข่งขัน/สนามแข่ง; การซ่อมแซมระยะสั้น; อื่นๆ
da: Anbefalet anvendelse: Nød- / midlertidig reparation; Langsigtet reparation; Forebyggende (mindre nedsivning); Racing/banebrug; Kortsigtet reparation; Andet
vi: Trường hợp sử dụng khuyến nghị: Sửa chữa khẩn cấp/tạm thời; Sửa chữa dài hạn; Phòng ngừa (thấm rỉ nhẹ); Đua/Sử dụng trên đường đua; Sửa chữa ngắn hạn; Khác
ru: Рекомендуемый сценарий использования: Аварийный/временный ремонт; Долгосрочный ремонт; Профилактический (незначительные протечки); Гоночное/трековое использование; Краткосрочный ремонт; Другое
ko: 권장 사용 사례: 응급/임시 수리; 장기 수리; 예방(미세 누수); 레이싱/트랙용; 단기 수리; 기타
hr-HR: Preporučena namjena: Hitni/privremeni popravci; Dugoročni popravci; Preventivno (manja propuštanja); Za utrke / stazu; Kratkoročni popravci; Ostalo
fr: Cas d'utilisation recommandé: Réparation d'urgence/temporaire; Réparation à long terme; Préventif (suintement mineur); Course/utilisation sur circuit; Réparation à court terme; Autre
zh-CN: 推荐使用场景: 紧急/临时维修; 长期维修; 预防性（轻微渗漏）; 赛车/赛道使用; 短期维修; 其他
nl: Aanbevolen toepassingen: Nood-/tijdelijke reparatie; Langdurige reparatie; Preventief (lichte doorsijpeling); Racen/circuitgebruik; Kortetermijnreparatie; Overig
sk-SK: Odporúčaný kryt na použitie: Núdzová/dočasná oprava; Dlhodobá oprava; Preventívne (drobné presakovanie); Preteky/použitie na trati; Krátkodobá oprava; Iné
ro-RO: Situație de utilizare recomandată: Reparație de urgență/temporară; Reparație pe termen lung; Preventiv (scurgeri minore); Curse/utilizare pe pistă; Reparație pe termen scurt; Altele